src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PLACE-DIMV !DIMINV for propernouns
               +Sg+Nom:         K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:         RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:         RProp ;
               +Sg+Acc:aX4      K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:aX4      K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:aX4      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Ill:aX3j     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:aX4s     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:aX4n     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:aX5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:aX4t     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:aX5jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:aX5jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:aX5jde   K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:aX5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K     ;
                  +Ess:an       K     ;




! Finnish Itkonen, lexicon for Finnish nen-names
! ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur
! For Finnish surnames. Itkonen.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc
! For Finnish placenames with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                    NENPLACELASH         ;

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL  ! Finnish names
 :s    FI-S       ; ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
 :nen9 LONDONDECL ; ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
! with ordinary genitive Itkonena

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL_PLC-ORG  ! Finnish names
 :s    FI-S_PLC-ORG       ; ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
 :nen9 LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
! with ordinary genitive Itkonena


! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S
   FI-S-OBL ;

! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S_PLC-ORG
   FI-S-OBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON FI-S-OBL
             +CmpN/SgG:       RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:a      K     ;
               +Sg+Acc:a      K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:ij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:is     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ijn    K     ;
                  +Ess:in     K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:at     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:ijdda  K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:ijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:ijgujn K     ;

LEXICON FI-S-OBL_PLC-ORG
             +CmpN/SgG:    RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
               +Sg+Acc:a   K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:is  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ijn K     ;
                  +Ess:in  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON FI-S-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +Der/laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames.
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr:%>s@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! Gerhardsens plass
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>             LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL         ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            LONDONDECL         ;
                                :%>            PLACELASH          ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #                  ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii


LEXICON LONDON-malsur
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-fem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            LONDONDECL ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;
        +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH       ; !

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH          ;

LEXICON JOKULL-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON LONDON-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON LONDONDECL ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
   LONDON-UCASE ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
   LONDON-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON LONDONDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
   LONDON-UCASE-LOAN ;


LEXICON LONDON-UCASE
              +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                          LONDON-OBL         ;
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-OBL         ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-OBL         ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)

LEXICON LONDON-UCASE_PLC-ORG
              +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                          LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)


LEXICON LONDON-UCASE-LOAN
              +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
             +Use/Sub:    LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)


LEXICON LONDON-OBL
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:       K ;
                +Sg+Acc:       K ;
                +Sg+Gen:a      K ;
                +Sg+Acc:a      K ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij     K ;
                +Sg+Loc:is     K ;
  +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in     K ; !SOUTH
                +Sg+Com:ijn    K ;
                   +Ess:in     K ;
                +Pl+Nom:at     K ;
                +Pl+Gen:ijd    K ;
                +Pl+Acc:ijd    K ;
                +Pl+Ill:ijdda  K ;
                +Pl+Loc:ijn    K ;
                +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
