src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Prefix-Proper
Nuorta-Agder LONDON-plc ;
Davvi-Fosen:Davvi-Fosen9 LONDON-sur ;
Davvi-Atlánta+Use/Sub:Davvi-Atlanter LONDON-plc ; !
Mátta-Gudbrandsdalen+Use/LexSub:Mátta-Gud^brands^dalen9 LONDON-plc ; !
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aarsæter:Aar^sæter LONDON-sur ;
Ašbel LONDON-mal ;
Ašer LONDON-sur ;
Bajip% Neaskim:Bajip9% Neaskim9 LONDON-plc ;
Beahceduolban:Beahce^duolban LONDON-plc ;
Beaivváš:Beaivváž LONDON-org ;
Beaivváš% Sámi% Teáhter LONDON-org ;
Beaivváš% Sámi% Teáhter+Use/Sub:Beaivváš% Sámi% teáhter LONDON-org ;
Beaivváš% Sámi% Našunálteáhter:Beaivváš% Sámi% Našunál^teáhter LONDON-org ;
Breiđafjörđur:Breiđa^fjörđur LONDON-plc ;
Báiddarhuksen:Báiddar^huksen9 LONDON-sur ; !XXX sur? seems more like org. translated into sámi
Ciprian LONDON-mal ;
Cizášbuollán:Cizáš^buollám LONDON-plc ;
Dišon:Dišon9 LONDON-sur ;
Dommos LONDON-mal ; !Turi, muitalus...
E-muzet:E-muzeh LONDON-ani ;
Enoš LONDON-malsur ;
Geakkán+Use/LexSub:Geakkán9 LONDON-plc ; !!Not sure
Ešban:Ešban9 LONDON-mal ;
Eškol LONDON-sur ;
SÁLAS LONDON-obj ;
SÁMÁS LONDON-obj ;
SÁNAG:SÁNAG LONDON-org ;
SÁNAG+Use/Sub:SANAG LONDON-org ;
Sábin:Sábin9 LONDON-sur ;
Sálas LONDON-obj ;
Francis LONDON-mal ;
Friijacampen:Friija^campen9 LONDON-org ;
Geršon:Geršon9 LONDON-plc ;
Granshagen:Granshagen9 LONDON-sur ;
Grønnåsen:Grønn^åsen9 LONDON-plc ;
Guovssahasteáhter:Guovssahas^te^áhter LONDON-org ;
Rávgoš% Teáhter:Rávgoš% Te^áhter LONDON-org ;
Hafnarfjörđur:Hafnar^fjörđur LONDON-plc ;
Hamas LONDON-org ;
Heanttut:Heanttuh LONDON-mal ;
Husbanken LONDON-org ;
Hušam:Hušam9 LONDON-sur ;
Hålogalánddaalmennet:Håloga^lándda#almenneh LONDON-obj ;
Hålogalánddaalmennet+Use/Sub:Håloga^lánda#almenneh LONDON-obj ;
Hålogalánddaalmennet+Use/Sub:Håloga^landda#almenneh LONDON-obj ;
Hålogalánddaalmennet+Use/Sub:Håloga^landa#almenneh LONDON-obj ;
Hålogalánddaalmennet+Use/Sub:Håloga^land#almenneg LONDON-obj ;
Ildtoppen:Ildtoppen9 LONDON-org ;
Ilis LONDON-plc ;
TV-guvtteš:TV-guvttež LONDON-org ;
Internašunála% Sámi% Filbmaguovddáš:Internašunála% Sámi% Filbmaguovddáž LONDON-org ;
Internašunála% Sámi% Filbmaguovddáš+Use/Sub:Internationála% Sámi% filbmaguovddáž LONDON-org ;
Internašunála% Sámi% Filbmaguovddáš+Use/Sub:Internationála% Sámi% Filbmaguovddáž LONDON-org ;
Ipmil LONDON-mal ;
Janoš LONDON-mal ;
Kadeš LONDON-plc ;
Kaijalainen:Kaijalai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Kaijanen:Kaija C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Katajainen:Katajai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Keijonen:Keijo C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Klassekampen:Klasse^kampen9 LONDON-org ;
Kušnir LONDON-sur ;
Laulajainen:Laulajai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Luovan:Luovan9 LONDON-plc ;
Maijanen:Maija C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Maijen:Maijen9 LONDON-fem ;
Majoinen:Majoi C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Metušael:Metuša^el LONDON-mal ;
Mikel LONDON-mal ;
Miren LONDON-fem ;
Máijan:Máijan9 LONDON-fem ; ! is this correct, or is it Essive?
Nafiš LONDON-plc ;
Nemirovič LONDON-sur ;
Nikken LONDON-mal ;
Noaidun:Noaidum LONDON-plc ;
Ojalainen:Ojalai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Orvoš LONDON-obj ;
Pildaš LONDON-mal ;
Rammstein:Ramm^stein9 LONDON-org ;
Ratnjan:Ratnjan9 LONDON-plc ;
Reaiddáglaciären:Reaiddá^glaciären9 LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Reijonen:Reijo C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Reinkalver LONDON-obj ;
Roškov LONDON-sur ;
Salkunen:Salku C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Siglufjörđur:Siglu^fjörđur LONDON-plc ;
Sirgurđur LONDON-mal ;
Sottinen:Sotti C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Stuorra-Peđar LONDON-mal ;
Sáltoduottar-Svartisen:Sálto^duottar-Svart^isen LONDON-sur ;
Sámi% Amatör% Teáhter+Use/LexSub:Sámi% Amatör% Teáhter LONDON-org ; !
Sámi% teáhter LONDON-org ;
Tahaš LONDON-plc ;
Teorifágagárdin:Teori^fága^gárdim LONDON-obj ;
Toijonen:Toijo C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Veijalainen:Veijalai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Veijanen:Veija C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Veijonen:Veijo C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Gáivuona% suohkan:Gáivuona% suohkan9 LONDON-org ;
Loabaga% suohkan:Loabaga% suohkan9 LONDON-org ;
Guovdageainnu% suohkan:Guovdageainnu% suohkan9 LONDON-org ;
Vopnafjörđur:Vopna^fjörđur LONDON-plc ;
Vuojolainen:Vuojolai C-FI-NEN-sur ;
Áigin:Áigin9 LONDON-mal ;
Ánin% Dánin:Ánin% Dánin9 LONDON-obj ;
Ánin% Dánin+Use/Sub:Ánin% dánin9 LONDON-obj ;
Táhppán% Siun:Táhppán% Siun9 LONDON-obj ;
Táhppán% Siun+Use/Sub:Táhppán% siun9 LONDON-obj ;
Áilloš LONDON-mal ;
Ájlin:Áj9lin LONDON-fem ;
Áššur LONDON-mal ;
Òdáđahraun LONDON-plc ;
Öræfajökull:Öræfa^jökull JOKULL-plc ;
Čeakčahjälmen:Čeakča^hjälmen9 LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Šealtiel LONDON-mal ;
Šelef LONDON-mal ;
Černobyl LONDON-plc ;
Šiauliai+Use/Sub:Ši^auli^ai LONDON-sur ; !
Šillem:Šillem9 LONDON-sur ;
Šinab:Šinab9 LONDON-mal ;
Šobal LONDON-plc ;
ČálliidLágádus LONDON-org ;
